Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF378.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 1046HV (2) 91 sb/js H.F. 378 Section 1. Section 481C.2, subsections 1 and 2, Code 2025, 1 are amended to read as follows: 2 1. The director of the department of natural resources shall 3 enter into a memorandum of agreement with the United States 4 department of agriculture, animal damage control division. 5 The wild animal depredation unit shall serve and act as the 6 liaison to the department for the producers in the state who 7 suffer crop, horticultural product, tree, or nursery damage an 8 economic loss to agriculture, horticulture, or silviculture 9 operations due to wild animals. 10 2. The department shall issue depredation permits and deer 11 shooting permits to any landowner or tenant, as defined under 12 section 483A.24, subsection 2, who incurs crop, horticultural 13 product, tree, or nursery damage suffers an economic loss of 14 one thousand dollars or more to agriculture, horticulture, or 15 silviculture operations due to wild animals. The department 16 shall allow any conservation officer to issue permits pursuant 17 to this chapter. 18 Sec. 2. Section 481C.2A, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 19 2025, is amended to read as follows: 20 a. Deer shooting permits shall be available for issuance 21 to landowners or tenants, as defined under section 483A.24, 22 subsection 2, who incur crop, horticultural product, tree, 23 or nursery damage suffer an economic loss to agriculture, 24 horticulture, or silviculture operations as provided in section 25 481C.2 and shall be available for issuance for use on areas 26 where public safety may be an issue. 27 Sec. 3. Section 481C.2A, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended 28 by adding the following new paragraph: 29 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. There shall be an annual deer depredation 30 season from January 11 through January 31 for any person 31 possessing a valid depredation license and tag or deer shooting 32 permit issued pursuant to this section on or after February 1 33 of the preceding calendar year. The method of take for the 34 deer depredation season shall be a rifle using a cartridge 35 -1- LSB 1046HV (2) 91 sb/js 1/ 3 H.F. 378 approved by the department, a shotgun, a muzzleloader, a 1 handgun, a crossbow, or a bow. 2 Sec. 4. Section 481C.2A, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 3 following new subsection: 4 NEW SUBSECTION . 8. Notwithstanding any other provision of 5 law to the contrary, any deer taken with a depredation license 6 or shooting permit issued under this chapter by the person to 7 whom the license or permit was issued may be disposed of by 8 composting or wastage. 9